src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V-antaa_01
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:a%>%^WCnsn	#   ; ! oon
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:a%>%^WCnst	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:a%>%^LCnsAÄ1	K_V   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:a%>%^WCnsmmAÄ1	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:a%>%^WCnsttAÄ1	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:a%>%^LCnsAÄ1t	K_V   ;
+Ind+Prs+4:e%>%^WCnstaa	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:a%>%^WCns	#   ;

:o%>%^WCnsi IndPrt_1-2 ;
:oi IndPrt_3 ;
!+Ind+Prt+Sg1:o%>%^WCnsin       #   ; ! oon
!+Ind+Prt+Sg2:o%>%^WCnsit       #   ;
!+Ind+Prt+Sg3:oi        #   ;
!+Ind+Prt+Pl1:o%>%^WCnsimma     #   ;
!+Ind+Prt+Pl2:o%>%^WCnsitta     #   ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:oivat     #   ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:e%>tii     #   ;
+Ind+ConNeg+Prt:e%>%^WCnsttUY1         #   ;

:an PotPers ; ! antannoo
!+Pot+4:ollaa      #   ;
!+Pot+ConNeg:oo                #   ;

! +Cond+Sg1:olisin      #   ; ! oon
! +Cond+Sg2:olisit      #   ;
! +Cond+Sg3:olis      #   ;
! +Cond+Pl1:olisimma    #   ;
! +Cond+Pl2:olisitta    #   ;
! +Cond+Pl3:olisivat     #   ;
! +Cond+4:oltais      #   ;
! !+Cond+ConNeg:oo                #   ;

! 
+V:a ImprtPers_k ;
+Imprt+Sg2:a%>%^WCns      #   ;
+Imprt+4:e%>%^WCnsttAÄ1kkOÖ1OÖ1     #   ;
! !+Imprt+ConNeg:oo                #   ;
! 
:a V-actor_jA ; !
:a V-ActPrsPrc ; ! antava
:a	V-ActPrtPrc_nt   ; !antant
+Prc:e%>%^WCnsttAÄ1vAÄ1	A-tulova   ;
+PrtPrc:e%>%^WCnsttUY1	 	A-kova   ;
+V+Inf+Der/tOin:amAÄ1t A-kalatoin ; ! antamatoin
! 
+Inf:a%>%^LCnsAÄ1             #   ; ! antaa
+Inf:amAÄ1  SG-ILL_V   ; ! antamaa
! +Inf+Ine:olemaas      #   ;
! +Inf+Ela:olemast      #   ;
! +Inf+Abe:olemata      #   ;
! +Ger:ollees		#   ;
+Der/miin:a%>mi N-inmihiin ;

! lukkia:luk
LEXICON V-lukkia
+V: V-lukkia_01 ;

LEXICON V-lukkia_01
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:e%>%^WCnsn	#   ; ! oon
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:e%>%^WCnst	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:OÖ1%>%^LCnsV3	K_V   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:e%>%^WCnsmmAÄ1	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:e%>%^WCnsttAÄ1	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:OÖ1%>%^LCnsV3t	K_V   ;
+Ind+Prs+4:e%>%^WCnstAÄ1AÄ1	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:e%>%^WCns	#   ;

:%^TSi IndPrt ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^TSivAÄ1t     K_V   ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:e%>%^WCnstii     #   ;
+Ind+ConNeg+Prt:e%>%^WCnsttUY1         #   ;

:en PotPers ; ! lukennoo
!+Pot+4:ollaa      #   ;
!+Pot+ConNeg:oo                #   ;

 CondPers ; ! lukisin
! +Cond+4:oltais      #   ;
! !+Cond+ConNeg:oo                #   ;
! 
:e ImprtPers_k ;
! +Imprt+Sg2:oo      #   ;
! +Imprt+4:oltakoo      #   ;
! !+Imprt+ConNeg:oo                #   ;
! 
:i V-actor_jA ; !
:e V-ActPrsPrc ; ! lukeva
:e	V-ActPrtPrc_nt   ; ! lukent
+Prc:e%>%^WCnsttAÄ1vAÄ1	A-tulova   ;
+PrtPrc:e%>%^WCnsttUY1	 	A-kova   ;
+V+Inf+Der/tOin:emAÄ1t A-kalatoin ; ! lukematoin
! 
+Inf:i%>%^LCnsAÄ1             #   ; ! antaa
+Inf:OÖ1mAÄ1  SG-ILL_V   ; ! antamaa
+Inf:emAÄ1  SG-ILL_V   ; ! antamaa
+Inf:emAÄ1 SG-INE   ;
+Inf:emAÄ1 SG-ELA   ;
+Inf:emAÄ1 SG-ABE   ;
! +Ger:ollees		#   ;
+Der/miin:OÖ1%>mi N-inmihiin ;

! tiitää:tiit
LEXICON V-tiitää
+V: V-tiitää_01 ;

LEXICON V-tiitää_01
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:e%>%^WCnsn	#   ; ! tiijen
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:e%>%^WCnst	#   ; ! tiijet
!+Ind+Prs+Sg3:AÄ1%>%^LCnsAÄ1		K_V   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:e%>%^WCnsmmAÄ1	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:e%>%^WCnsttAÄ1	#   ;
!+Ind+Prs+Pl3:AÄ1%>%^LCnsAÄ1t	K_V   ;
+Ind+Prs+4:e%>%^WCnstAÄ1AÄ1	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+4%^LCns:e%>%^WCnstAÄ1	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:e%>%^WCns	#   ; ! tiije

!+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>%^WCnsin       #   ; ! oon
!+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>%^WCnsit       #   ;
!+Ind+Prt+Sg3:i        K_V   ;
!+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>%^WCnsi%>mmAÄ1     #   ;
!+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>%^WCnsi%>ttAÄ1     #   ;
!+Ind+Prt+Pl3:i%>vAÄ1t     K_V   ;
!+Ind+Prt+4:e%>%^WCnsttii     #   ;
!+Ind+ConNeg+Prt:e%>%^WCnsttUY1         #   ;
!! Fix 2012-10-04
!+Pot+Sg1:AÄ1%>nen      #   ; ! oon
!+Pot+Sg2:AÄ1%>net      #   ;
!+Pot+Sg3:AÄ1%>nOÖ1OÖ1      #   ;
!+Pot+Pl1:AÄ1%>nemmAÄ1    #   ;
!+Pot+Pl2:AÄ1%>nettAÄ1    #   ;
!+Pot+Pl3:AÄ1%>nOÖ1OÖ1t     #   ;
!!+V+Pot+4:ollaa      #   ;
!!+V+Pot+ConNeg:oo                #   ;
!
:AÄ1 CondPers ;
!! +V+Cond+Sg1:olisin      #   ; ! oon
!! +V+Cond+Sg2:olisit      #   ;
!! +V+Cond+Sg3:olis      #   ;
!! +V+Cond+Pl1:olisimma    #   ;
! +V+Cond+Pl2:olisitta    #   ;
! +V+Cond+Pl3:olisivat     #   ;
! +V+Cond+4:oltais      #   ;
! !+V+Cond+ConNeg:oo                #   ;
! 
+V:AÄ1 ImprtPers_k ;
! +V+Imprt+Sg2:oo      #   ;
! +V+Imprt+4:oltakoo      #   ;
! !+V+Imprt+ConNeg:oo                #   ;
! 
:AÄ1 V-actor_jA ; !
! +V+Prc:oleva			       #   ; !V-ActPrsPrc
:AÄ1  V-ActPrtPrc_nt ; !? tiitänt
!+Prc:e%>%^WCnsttAÄ1vAÄ1	A-tulova   ;
+PrtPrc:e%>%^WCnsttUY1     A-kova  ;
+V+Inf+Der/tOin:emAÄ1t A-kalatoin ; ! tiitämätöin
! 
+Inf:AÄ1AÄ1             #   ; ! tiitää
!+Inf:AÄ1%>%^LCnsmAÄ1  SG-ILL_V  ; ! pittämää
! +V+Inf+Ine:olemaas      #   ;
! +V+Inf+Ela:olemast      #   ;
! +V+Inf+Abe:olemata      #   ;
! +V+Ger:ollees		#   ;
+Der/miin:AÄ1mi N-inmihiin ;



LEXICON V-näyttää
+V: V-näyttää_01 ;

LEXICON V-näyttää_01
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:AÄ1%>%^WCnsn	K_V  ; ! oon
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:AÄ1%>%^WCnst	K_V   ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:AÄ1%>%^LCnsAÄ1		K_V   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:AÄ1%>%^WCnsmmAÄ1	K_V   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:AÄ1%>%^WCnsttAÄ1	K_V   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:AÄ1%>%^LCnsAÄ1t	K_V   ;
+Ind+Prs+4:e%>%^WCnsttAÄ1AÄ1	K_V   ;
+Ind+Prs+4:e%>%^WCnstAÄ1AÄ1	K_V   ; !keitetää
+Ind+Prs+4+ConNeg:e%>%^WCnstAÄ1	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:AÄ1%>%^WCns	#   ;

:%^TSi IndPrt ;
!+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%^TSi%>%^WCnsn       #   ; ! oon
!+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^TSi%>%^WCnst       #   ;
!+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%^TSi        K_V   ;
!+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%^TSi%>%^WCnsmmAÄ1     #   ;
!+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%^TSi%>%^WCnsttAÄ1     #   ;
!+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^TSivAÄ1t     K_V   ;
+Ind+Prt+4:e%>%^WCnsttii     #   ;
+Ind+ConNeg+Prt:e%>%^WCnsttUY1         #   ;
! Fix 2012-10-04
:AÄ1n PotPers ; ! näyttännöö
+Pot+4:e%>%^WCnsttAÄ1nnOÖ1OÖ1 K_V   ;
!+Pot+ConNeg:oo                #   ;

:AÄ1 CondPers ; !
+Cond+4:e%>%^WCnsttAÄ1is      K_V   ;
! !+Cond+ConNeg:oo                #   ;
! 
:AÄ1 ImprtPers_k ;
! +Imprt+Sg2:oo      #   ;
! !+Imprt+Pl3:olisivat     #   ; ! laa ovat
+Imprt+4:e%>%^WCnsttAÄ1kkOÖ1OÖ1 #   ;
! !+Imprt+ConNeg:oo                #   ;
! 
:AÄ1 V-actor_jA ; !
:AÄ1 V-ActPrsPrc ; ! näyttävä
:AÄ1  V-ActPrtPrc_nt ; ! näyttänt
+PrsPrc:e%>%^WCnsttAÄ1vAÄ1	A-tulova   ;
+PrtPrc:e%>%^WCnsttUY1		A-kova   ;
+V+Inf+Der/tOin:AÄ1mAÄ1t A-kalatoin ; ! näyttämätöin
! 
+Inf:%>%^LCnsAÄ1%>AÄ1             #   ; ! näyttää
+Inf:AÄ1%>%^LCnsmAÄ1  SG-ILL_V  ; ! näyttämää
+Inf:AÄ1mAÄ1 SG-INE   ;
+Inf:AÄ1mAÄ1 SG-ELA   ;
+Inf:AÄ1mAÄ1 SG-ABE   ;
+Ger:AÄ1jees K_V   ;
+Der/miin:AÄ1mi N-inmihiin ;

! laatia:laati
LEXICON V-laatia
 V-kutsua ;
 IndPrt ; ! laati

! kiirehtiä:kiireh
! 3-syllable
LEXICON V-kiirehtiä
+V:ti V-kutsua_01 ;
+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:hi K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:hin	K_V   ; ! kutsun
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2:hit	K_V   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:himmAÄ1	K_V   ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:hittAÄ1	K_V   ;

! ilmahtua:ilmah
! 3-syllable
LEXICON V-ilmahtua
+V:tUY1 V-kutsua_01 ;
+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:hUY1 K ;

! hyväksyä:hyväksy
LEXICON V-hyväksyä
+V: V-kutsua_01 ;

! kutsua:kutsu
LEXICON V-kutsua
+V: V-kutsua_01 ;
