src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON verbs
kiirehtiä:kiireh V-kiirehtiä  "" ;
kehittyä:kehitty V-kutsua  "" ;
lukkia:luk V-lukkia  "" ;
käskiä:käsk V-lukkia  "" ;
kulkia:kulk V-lukkia  "" ;
särkiä:särk V-lukkia  "" ;
lähtiä:läht V-lukkia  "" ;
tuntia:tunt V-lukkia  "" ;
pittää:pit V-näyttää  "" ;
näyttää:näytt V-näyttää  "" ;
keittää:keitt V-näyttää  "" ;
soittaa:soitt V-näyttää  "" ;
suittaa:suitt V-näyttää  "" ;
keittää:keitt V-näyttää  "" ;
pistää:pist V-näyttää  "" ;
hoitaa:hoit V-näyttää  "" ;
jättää:jätt V-näyttää  "" ;
kylvää:kylv V-näyttää  "" ;
kyntää:kynt V-näyttää  "" ;
kääntää:käänt V-näyttää  "" ;
lentää:lent V-näyttää  "" ;
keeltää:keelt V-näyttää  "" ;
keeltää:kielt V-näyttää  "" ;
keeltää:kiilt V-näyttää  "" ;
stroittaa:stroitt V-näyttää  "" ;
soittaa:soitt V-näyttää  "" ;
kyntää:kynt V-näyttää  "" ;
liittää:liitt V-näyttää  "" ;
muuttaa:muutt V-näyttää  "" ;
täyttää:täytt V-näyttää  "" ;
käyttää:käytt V-näyttää  "" ;
toittaa:toitt V-näyttää  "" ;
ottaa:ott V-näyttää  "" ;
purkaa:purk V-näyttää  "" ;
ostaa:ost V-näyttää  "" ;
kestää:kest V-näyttää  "" ;
muistaa:muist V-näyttää  "" ;
nostaa:nost V-näyttää  "" ;
pyytää:pyyt V-näyttää  "" ;
soutaa:sout V-näyttää  "" ;
ellää:el V-näyttää  "" ;
löytää:löyt V-näyttää  "" ;
tiitää:tiit V-tiitää  "" ;
veittää:veitt V-näyttää  "" ;
sattaa:sat V-näyttää  "" ;
rinnoittaa:rinnoitt V-näyttää  "" ;
kutsua:kutsu V-kutsua  "" ;
keehua:keehu V-kutsua  "" ;
keehua:kiehu V-kutsua  "" ;
keehua:kiihu V-kutsua  "" ;
kysyä:kysy V-kutsua  "" ;
sammua:sammu V-kutsua  "" ;
seisoa:seiso V-kutsua  "" ;
yhtyä:yhty V-kutsua  "" ;
tahtoa:tahto V-kutsua  "" ;
ulvoa:ulvo V-kutsua  "" ;
tokkua:tokku V-kutsua  "" ;
haukkua:haukku V-kutsua  "" ;
heeroa:heero V-kutsua  "" ;
heeroa:hiero V-kutsua  "" ;
heeroa:hiiro V-kutsua  "" ;
etsiä:etsi V-kutsua  "" ;
ampua:ampu V-kutsua  "" ;
tahtoa:tahto V-kutsua  "" ;
painua:painu V-kutsua  "" ;
taittua:taittu V-kutsua  "" ;
tuntua:tuntu V-kutsua  "" ;
löytyä:löyty V-kutsua  "" ;
istua:istu V-kutsua  "" ;
ilmahtua:ilmah V-ilmahtua  "" ;
unohtua:unoh V-ilmahtua  "" ;
hyväksyä:hyväksy V-hyväksyä  "" ;
voimistua:voimistu V-hyväksyä  "" ;
vanhettua:vanhettu V-hyväksyä  "" ;
lyhentyä:lyhenty V-hyväksyä  "" ;
mööhästyä:mööhästy V-hyväksyä  "" ;
näkkyä:näky V-kutsua  "" ;
sittoa:sito V-kutsua  "" ;
kuttoa:kuto V-kutsua  "" ;
yhistyä:yhisty V-kutsua  "" ;
vaihtua:vaihtu V-kutsua  "" ;
rippua:rippu V-kutsua  "" ;
tapahtua:tapah V-ilmahtua  "" ;
laatia:laati V-laatia  "" ;
loiskia:loiski V-laatia  "" ;
onkia:onki V-laatia  "" ;
ehtiä:ehti V-laatia  "" ;
sluuƶia:sluuƶi V-laatia  "" ;
laahia:laahi V-laatia  "" ;
hoitua:hoitu V-kutsua  "" ;
joutua:joutu V-kutsua  "" ;
kuulua:kuulu V-kutsua  "" ;
liittyä:liitty V-kutsua  "" ;
muuttua:muuttu V-kutsua  "" ;
puuttua:puuttu V-kutsua  "" ;
syntyä:synty V-kutsua  "" ;
loppua:loppu V-kutsua  "" ;
katsoa:katso V-kutsua  "" ;
